Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1404
Legislature's Planning Committee;
powers.

In
order to fulfill its duties, the Legislature's Planning Committee may:

(1) Hold public
hearings;

(2) Obtain data and information from state agencies, the University
of Nebraska, and private entities that contract with the state;

(3) Contract
for assistance, including consultants, with the approval of the Executive
Board of the Legislative Council; and

(4) Exercise any other authority or powers
as granted from time to time by the executive board.

Laws 2009, LB653, § 4.